test/src/morphology/V-suaja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - suaja: # Verb 'to receive / saada' - full paradigm
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: suan
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: suat
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: suau
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: suammo
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: suatto
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: suajah
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: sua
      suaja+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3: suaja
 
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: sain
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: sait
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: sai
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: saimmo
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: saitto
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: suadih
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: suannuh
      suaja+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: suadu
      
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  suazin
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  suazit
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  suas
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  suazimmo
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  suazitto
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  suadas
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: suas
      suaja+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suadas

      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  suannuzin
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  suannuzit
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  suannus
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  suannuzimmo
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  suannuzitto
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  suadanus
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: suannus
      suaja+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suadanus

      suaja+V+Pot+ScSg1:  suannen
      suaja+V+Pot+ScSg2:  suannet
      suaja+V+Pot+ScSg3:  suannou
      suaja+V+Pot+ScPl1:  suannemmo
      suaja+V+Pot+ScPl2:  suannetto
      suaja+V+Pot+ScPl3:  suadaneh
      suaja+V+Pot+ConNeg: suanne
      suaja+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suadane

      suaja+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  sua
      suaja+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  suagah
      suaja+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  suaguammo
      suaja+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [suagua, suaguatto]
      suaja+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  suadahes
      suaja+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: sua
      suaja+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: suagah
      suaja+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: suaguammo
      suaja+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: suagua
      suaja+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: suadahes

      suaja+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: suaju
      suaja+V+ActPrfPrc: suannuh
      suaja+V+PssPrsPrc: suadavu
      suaja+V+PssPrfPrc: suadu

      suaja+V+Inf: suaja
 
 
